en: Hair Coloring Accessories
xx: Hair Coloring Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k barvení vlasů
da: Tilbehør til hårfarvning
de: Zubehör für Haarcolorationen
es: Accesorios para teñir el cabello
fr: Accessoires pour la coloration
it: Accessori per la colorazione dei capelli da colorare
ja: ヘアカラー用品
nl: Accessoires voor haarkleuring
no: Tilbehør til hårfarging
pl: Akcesoria do farbowania włosów
pt: Acessórios para tintura de cabelo
ru: Принадлежности для окрашивания волос
sv: Tillbehör till hårfärgning
tr: Saç Boyama Aksesuarları

en: Hair Loss Concealers
xx: Hair Loss Concealers
cs: Přípravky na zhušťování vlasů
da: Concealere mod hårtab
de: Haarverdichter
es: Productos para ocultar la pérdida capilar
fr: Correcteurs pour perte de cheveux
it: Correttori per la perdita di capelli
ja: 薄毛用コンシーラー
nl: Maskeermiddelen bij haaruitval
no: Hårtapskjulere
pl: Produkty maskujące przerzedzenia włosów
pt: Corretivos para perda de cabelo
ru: Средства\, скрывающие облысение
sv: Medel för att dölja håravfall
tr: Saç Dökülmesi Kapatıcılar

en: Hair Loss Treatments
xx: Hair Loss Treatments
cs: Přípravky proti vypadávání vlasů
da: Behandling af hårtab
de: Mittel gegen Haarverlust
es: Tratamientos contra la caída del cabello
fr: Soins antichute des cheveux
it: Trattamenti caduta capelli
ja: 抜け毛対策グッズ
nl: Behandelingen voor haaruitval
no: Hårtapbehandlinger
pl: Preparaty przeciw wypadaniu włosów
pt: Tratamentos para calvície
ru: Средства против выпадения волос
sv: Behandlingar mot håravfall
tr: Saç Dökülmesi Tedavileri

en: Hair Permanents & Straighteners
xx: Hair Permanents & Straighteners
cs: Přípravky pro zvlnění a narovnání vlasů
da: Hårpermanent og hårglatning
de: Mittel für Dauerwellen & Haarglättung\, chemische Haarglättung
es: Rizadores y alisadores de pelo
fr: Solutions pour friser et défriser les cheveux
it: Permanenti e prodotti raddrizzare capelli
ja: ヘアパーマ・ストレートパーマ
nl: Permanentproducten en straighteners
no: Permanent og antipermanent
pl: Utrwalacze i środki do prostowania
pt: Alisadores de cabelo
ru: Средства для перманентной завивки и распрямления волос
sv: Permanentbehandlingar och rakpermanent
tr: Perma ve Düzleştirme Makineleri

en: Hair Shears
xx: Hair Shears
cs: Nůžky na vlasy
da: Hårsakse
de: Haarscheren
es: Tijeras del pelo
fr: Ciseaux de coiffeur
it: Forbici per capelli
ja: 散髪はさみ
nl: Kappersscharen
no: Hårsakser
pl: Nożyczki do włosów
pt: Tesouras de cabelo
ru: Ножницы для стрижки волос
sv: Frisörsaxar
tr: Kuaför Makasları

en: Hair Steamers & Heat Caps
xx: Hair Steamers & Heat Caps
cs: Napařovače vlasů a termické čepice
da: Dampning af hår og vamehætter
de: Trockenhauben
es: Vaporizadores para el cabello y gorros térmicos
fr: Casques à vapeur et bonnets chauffants
it: Caschi da parrucchiere
ja: ヘアスチーマー・ヒートキャップ
nl: Haarstomers en droogkappen
no: Hårdampere og varmehetter
pl: Podgrzewacze i czapki podgrzewające do włosów
pt: Toucas térmicas
ru: Вапоризаторы и термошапки для волос
sv: Värmeplattor och ångprodukter för hår
tr: Saç Buhar Makineleri ve Isıtma Başlıkları

en: Hair Styling Products
xx: Hair Styling Products
cs: Gely\, spreje a pěny
da: Produkter til hårstyling
de: Styling-Gel\, Haarspray & Haarschaum
es: Espumas\, lacas y geles de peinado
fr: Gels\, mousses et sprays coiffants
it: Fissatore in gel\, spray e schiuma
ja: ヘアスタイリング剤
nl: Haargel\, -lak en -mousse
no: Produkter for hårstyling
pl: Kosmetyki do stylizacji włosów
pt: Produtos de penteado
ru: Средства для укладки волос
sv: Hårstylingsprodukter
tr: Saç Şekillendirme Ürünleri

en: Hair Styling Tool Accessories
xx: Hair Styling Tool Accessories
cs: Nástroje pro vlasový styling – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til hårstylingredskaber
de: Zubehör für Haarstyling-Geräte
es: Accesorios para útiles de peluquería
fr: Accessoires pour outils de coiffure
it: Accessori per utensili per parrucchieri
ja: ヘアスタイリング道具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor haarstylingsapparaten
no: Tilbehør til verktøy for hårstyling
pl: Akcesoria do stylizacji włosów
pt: Acessórios para utensílios de penteado
ru: Принадлежности для инструментов для укладки волос
sv: Tillbehör till hårstylingsprodukter
tr: Saç Şekillendirme Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Hair Curler Clips & Pins
xx: Hair Curler Clips & Pins
cs: Svorky a spony na natáčky
da: Clips og nåle til curlere
de: Lockenwicklerklammern & -nadeln
es: Pinzas y horquillas para rulos
fr: Bigoudis et pics à bigoudis
it: Fermagli e spilloni per bigodini
ja: ヘアカーラー用クリップ・ピン
nl: Klemmen en pennen voor krultangen
no: Krøllspenner og nåler
pl: Wałki do włosów i spinki do wałków
pt: Pregadores e rolos para cabelo
ru: Бигуди и шпильки для бигуди
sv: Pinnar och klämmor till hårrullar
tr: Bigudi Kıskaç ve İğneleri

en: Hair Dryer Accessories
xx: Hair Dryer Accessories
cs: Fény – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til hårtørrere
de: Haartrocknerzubehör
es: Accesorios para secadores
fr: Accessoires pour sèche-cheveux
it: Accessori asciugacapelli
ja: ヘアドライヤー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor haardrogers
no: Tilbehør til hårfønere
pl: Akcesoria do suszarek do włosów
pt: Acessórios para secadores de cabelo
ru: Принадлежности для сушки волос
sv: Hårtorkstillbehör
tr: Saç Kurutma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Hair Iron Accessories
xx: Hair Iron Accessories
cs: Žehličky na vlasy – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til hårjern
de: Haareisenzubehör
es: Accesorios para planchas de pelo
fr: Accessoires pour fers à friser
it: Accessori arricciacapelli
ja: ヘアアイロン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor haartangen
no: Tilbehør til hårjern
pl: Akcesoria do prostownic do włosów
pt: Acessórios para chapinhas
ru: Принадлежности для выпрямления волос
sv: Plattångstillbehör
tr: Saç Düzleştirici Aksesuarları

en: Hair Styling Tools
xx: Hair Styling Tools
cs: Nástroje pro vlasový styling
da: Redskaber til hårstyling
de: Haarstyling-Geräte
es: Útiles de peluquería
fr: Outils de coiffure
it: Utensili per parrucchieri
ja: ヘアスタイリング道具
nl: Haarstylingsapparaten
no: Verktøy for hårstyling
pl: Narzędzia do stylizacji włosów
pt: Utensílios de penteado
ru: Инструменты для укладки волос
sv: Frisörredskap
tr: Saç Şekillendirme Aletleri

en: Combs & Brushes
xx: Combs & Brushes
cs: Hřebeny a kartáče
da: Kamme og børster
de: Kämme & Bürsten
es: Peines y cepillos
fr: Peignes et brosses
it: Pettini e spazzole
ja: くし・ブラシ
nl: Kammen en borstels
no: Kammer og børster
pl: Grzebienie i szczotki
pt: Pentes e escovas
ru: Гребни и расчески
sv: Kammar och borstar
tr: Taraklar ve Fırçalar

en: Curling Irons
xx: Curling Irons
cs: Kulmy
da: Krøllejern
de: Lockenstäbe
es: Tenacillas
fr: Fers à friser, Fer à friser
it: Arricciacapelli
ja: カールアイロン
nl: Krultangen
no: Krølljern
pl: Lokówki do włosów
pt: Pranchas modeladoras
ru: Щипцы для завивки волос
sv: Locktänger
tr: Saç Maşaları

en: Hair Curlers
xx: Hair Curlers
cs: Natáčky na vlasy
da: Hårcurlere
de: Lockenwickler
es: Rulos
fr: Bigoudis
it: Bigodini
ja: ヘアカーラー
nl: Haarkrullers
no: Krølltenger
pl: Produkty nadające skręt włosom
pt: Bobes
ru: Средства для завивки волос
sv: Hårspolar
tr: Bigudiler

en: Hair Dryers
xx: Hair Dryers
cs: Fény
da: Hårtørrere
de: Haartrockner
es: Secadores
fr: Sèche-cheveux
it: Asciugacapelli
ja: ヘアドライヤー
nl: Föhns
no: Hårfønere
pl: Suszarki do włosów
pt: Secadores de cabelo
ru: Фены
sv: Hårtorkar
tr: Saç Kurutma Makineleri

en: Hair Straighteners
xx: Hair Straighteners
cs: Žehličky na vlasy
da: Glattejern
de: Haarglätter
es: Planchas de pelo
fr: Fers à lisser, Fer à lisser, Lisseurs, Lisseur, Lisseur électrique
it: Stiracapelli
ja: ストレートアイロン
nl: Stijltangen
no: Antipermanent
pl: Prostownice do włosów
pt: Chapinhas
ru: Утюжки для волос
sv: Plattänger
tr: Saç Düzleştiriciler

en: Hair Styling Tool Sets
xx: Hair Styling Tool Sets
cs: Sady přístrojů pro péči o vlasy
da: Hårstylingsapparatsæt
de: Hairstyling-Sets
es: Artículos para el pelo
fr: Ensembles d'accessoires de coiffure
it: Set di strumenti di parruccheria
ja: ヘアスタイリング用品セット
nl: Sets met haarstylingapparaten
no: Verktøysett for hårstyling
pl: Zestawy urządzeń do stylizacji włosów
pt: Conjuntos de aparelhos para modelagem dos cabelos
ru: Наборы инструментов для укладки
sv: Hårstylingsverktyg
tr: Saç Şekillendirme Araç Setleri

en: Shampoo & Conditioner
xx: Shampoo & Conditioner
cs: Šampony a kondicionéry
da: Shampoo og balsam
de: Shampoo & Spülung
es: Champú y acondicionador
fr: Shampooing et après-shampooing
it: Shampoo e balsamo
ja: シャンプー・コンディショナー
nl: Shampoo en conditioner
no: Sjampo og balsam
pl: Szampony i odżywki
pt: Xampu e condicionador
ru: Шампуни и кондиционеры
sv: Schampo och balsam
tr: Şampuan ve Bakım Kremleri

en: Conditioners
xx: Conditioners
cs: Kondicionéry
da: Conditioners
de: Spülungen
es: Acondicionadores
fr: Après-shampooings
it: Balsamo
ja: コンディショナー
nl: Conditioners
no: Hårbalsam
pl: Odżywki
pt: Condicionadores
ru: Кондиционеры
sv: Balsam
tr: Şampuanlar